Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,127
Annual salary bonus.

In any year for which an appropriation is made for the Master Teacher Program, each teacher in the Master Teacher Program shall receive an annual salary bonus of five thousand dollars up to a statewide total of one million dollars. If the number of teachers qualifying for the bonus exceeds the number which the one million dollars would fully fund at the five-thousand-dollar level, the bonuses shall be reduced such that each teacher in the program receives the same amount and the statewide total does not exceed one million dollars. The State Department of Education shall allocate the annual salary bonus to each teacher in the program. Payment of such annual salary bonus shall not exceed the life of the credentials and shall be made only upon approval by the department of an application or upon reapproval each year after receiving the initial salary bonus.

Laws 2000, LB 1399, § 10.